District of Columbia statutes.
42-3211

Action in ejectment — Claims for arrears of rent, double rent, and waste; jurisdiction of court; money judgment.

In either case the landlord may join with his claim for recovery of the possession of the leased premises a claim for all arrears of rent accrued to the termination of the tenancy, and, when the tenant has given the notice, for double rent from the termination of the tenancy to the verdict, or judgment, if the trial be by the court and for damages for waste; provided, that in such action before the Superior Court of the District of Columbia the amount so claimed shall be within its jurisdiction. If judgment for possession be rendered in favor of the plaintiff, he shall be entitled, at the same time, to a judgment for said arrears of rent, and for said double rent, as the case may be, to the date of the verdict or judgment as aforesaid, and for damages for waste.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1382, ch. 854, § 1226
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 542, ch. 1329
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

Cross References

Possessory actions, see § 16-1501 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1411.
1973 Ed., § 45-911.